California statutes. Public Resources Code
5784.

(a) A legislative body known as the board of directors shall govern every district. The board of directors shall establish policies for the operation of the district. The board of directors shall provide for the faithful implementation of those policies which is the responsibility of the employees of the district.

(b) Except as provided in this article, the board of directors consists of five members.

(c) No person shall be a candidate for or be appointed to the board of directors unless he or she is a voter of the district or the proposed district.

(d) Service on a municipal advisory council established pursuant to Section 31010 of the Government Code shall not be considered an incompatible office with service as an elected member of a board of directors.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5784.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if on December 31, 2001, a member of the board of directors was elected or appointed as a voter of this state and is an owner of real property within the district, pursuant to the former Section 5783.3, that person may continue to serve on that board of directors for the remainder of the term for which he or she was elected or appointed, and that person may be elected or appointed to that board of directors in the future after that term ends, provided that the person continues to be a voter of this state and an owner of real property within the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 863, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5784.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a local agency formation commission, in approving either a consolidation of districts or the reorganization of two or more districts into a single recreation and park district, pursuant to subdivisions (k) and (n) of Section 56886 of the Government Code, may temporarily increase the number of directors to serve on the board of directors of the consolidated or reorganized district to seven or nine, who shall be members of the board of directors of the districts to be consolidated or reorganized as of the effective date of the consolidation or reorganization.

(b) Upon the expiration of the terms of the members of the board of directors of the consolidated or reorganized district, whose terms first expire following the effective date of the consolidation or reorganization, the total number of members on the board of directors shall be reduced until the number equals five members.

(c) In addition to the powers granted under Section 1780 of the Government Code, in the event of a vacancy on the board of directors of the consolidated or reorganized district at which time the total number of directors is greater than five, the board of directors may, by majority vote of the remaining members of the board, choose not to fill the vacancy. In that event, the total membership of the board of directors shall be reduced by one board member.

(d) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Consolidation” means consolidation as defined in Section 56030 of the Government Code.

(2) “District” or “special district” means district or special district as defined in Section 56036 of the Government Code.

(3) “Reorganization” means reorganization as defined in Section 56073 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 643, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5784.3.

(a) The term of office of each member of a board of directors who has been elected or appointed to a fixed term is four years. Directors shall take office at noon on the first Friday in December following their election or their appointment to a fixed term.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), in the case of a district formed on or after January 1, 2002, the directors shall serve the terms determined pursuant to Section 5783.11.

(c) Any vacancy in the office of a member appointed to a board of directors shall be filled pursuant to Section 1779 of the Government Code.

(d) Any vacancy in the office of a member elected to a board of directors shall be filled pursuant to Section 1780 of the Government Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5784.5.

If a county board of supervisors or a city council has appointed itself as the board of directors, the board of supervisors or city council may delegate any or all of its powers to a recreation and park commission composed of five commissioners. In the case of a district governed by a board of supervisors, the commissioners may be council members of cities that are located in the district. The board of supervisors or city council shall determine whether the commissioners shall serve at its pleasure or for staggered terms of four years, subject to removal for cause. A commissioner shall be a voter of the district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5784.7.

(a) Within 45 days after their first election and after each general district election or unopposed election, or at the beginning of each new term for members of an appointed board, the board of directors shall meet and elect its officers.

(b) The officers of a board of directors are a chair and vice chair. A board of directors may create additional officers and elect members to those positions, provided that no member of a board of directors shall hold more than one office.

(c) The board of directors may appoint one of its members as secretary. The board of directors may also employ a clerk to perform the duties of the secretary. If the board of directors does not appoint a secretary, the clerk shall perform the duties of the secretary.

(d) In the case of a district that includes only incorporated territory within a single city, the city treasurer shall act as the district treasurer and shall receive no compensation for the receipt and disbursement of money of the district. In all other cases, the county treasurer of the principal county shall act as the district treasurer and shall receive no compensation for the receipt and disbursement of money of the district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5784.9.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 5784.7, a district may establish an alternative depositary pursuant to this section.

(b) The board of directors may adopt a resolution to designate a bank or a savings and loan association as the depositary of any or all of its funds. The board of directors and the board of supervisors of the principal county shall determine a mutually acceptable date for the transfer of the district’s funds to that depositary, not to exceed 15 months from the date on which the board of directors adopted its resolution.

(c) If the board of directors does not designate that depositary for all of its funds, the board of directors shall designate what funds are to be deposited in that depositary. The county treasurer shall be the depositary for all funds not so designated.

(d) The charges of any depositary designated pursuant to this section shall be a proper expense of the district.

(e) The board of directors shall appoint a person who shall be known as the finance officer, who shall serve at the pleasure of the board of directors. The finance officer may be a member of the board of directors, the general manager, or the office of finance officer may be consolidated with the office of secretary. The board of directors shall fix the amount of the finance officer’s compensation. The board of directors shall fix the amount of and approve the finance officer’s bond.

(f) Bond principal and interest and salaries shall be paid when due. Except as provided in subdivision (g), the board of directors shall approve all other claims and demands in an open meeting by a majority of the members of the board of directors.

(g) Warrants drawn in payment of claims and demands approved by the finance officer as conforming to an approved budget need not be approved by the board of directors prior to payment. These claims and demands shall be presented to the board of directors for ratification and approval in the audited comprehensive annual financial report.

(h) The finance officer shall draw the warrants. The warrants shall be signed by either the chair of the board of directors or another member of the board, and by either the secretary or the general manager. The board of directors, by ordinance or resolution, may prescribe an alternative method of drawing and signing warrants, provided that the method adheres to generally accepted accounting principles.

(i) The finance officer shall install and maintain a system of auditing and accounting that shall completely and at all times show the financial condition of the district.

(j) The finance officer shall make annual or more frequent written reports to the board of directors, as the board shall determine, regarding the receipts and disbursements and balances in the accounts that are controlled by the finance officer. The finance officer shall sign the reports and file them with the secretary.

(k) A bank or savings and loan association may act as a depositary, paying agent, or fiscal agent for the holding or handling of the district’s funds, notwithstanding the fact that a member of the board of directors whose funds are on deposit in that bank or savings and loan association is an officer, employee, or stockholder of that bank or savings and loan association, or of a holding company that owns any of the stock of that bank or savings and loan company.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5784.11.

A board of directors shall meet at least once every three months. Meetings of the board of directors are subject to the provisions of the Ralph M. Brown Act, Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5784.13.

(a) A majority of the board of directors shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

(b) The board of directors shall act only by ordinance, resolution, or motion.

(c) Except as otherwise specifically provided to the contrary in this chapter, a recorded majority vote of the total membership of the board of directors is required on each action.

(d) The board of directors shall keep a record of all its acts, including financial transactions.

(e) The board of directors shall adopt rules for its proceedings.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5784.15.

(a) The board of directors may provide, by ordinance or resolution, that each of its members may receive compensation in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for attending each meeting of the board. The board of directors, by ordinance adopted pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 20200) of Division 10 of the Water Code, may increase the amount of compensation received for attending meetings of the board.

(b) Board members shall not receive compensation for more than six meetings of the board in a calendar month. The board of directors shall, commencing
 January 1, 2019, if the district compensates its members for more than five meetings in a calendar month, annually adopt a written policy, based on a finding supported by substantial evidence, why more than five meetings per month are necessary for the effective operation of the district.

(c) In addition, members of the board of directors may receive their actual and necessary traveling and incidental expenses incurred while on official business.

(d) A member of the board of directors may waive the compensation.

(e) For the purposes of this section, a meeting of the board of directors includes, but is not limited to, regular meetings, special meetings, closed sessions, emergency meetings, board field trips, district
 public hearings, or meetings of a committee of the board.

(f) For purposes of this section, the determination of whether a director’s activities on any specific day are compensable shall be made pursuant to Article 2.3 (commencing with Section 53232) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(g) Reimbursement for these expenses is subject to Sections 53232.2 and 53232.3 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 170, Sec. 5.   (AB 2329)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Reorganizing the Board of Directors [5785. - 5785.5.]

5785.

(a) In the case of a district with an elected board of directors, the directors may be elected:

(1) At large.

(2) By divisions.

(3) From divisions.

(b) As used in this article:

(1) “By divisions” means the election of each member of the board of directors by voters of the division alone.

(2) “From divisions” means the election of members of the board of directors who are residents of the division from which they are elected by the voters of the entire district.

(c) A board of directors may be elected by any one of the methods described in subdivision (a) if a majority of the voters voting upon the question are in favor of the question at a general district or special election.

(d) The board of directors may adopt a resolution placing the question on the ballot. Alternatively, upon receipt of a petition signed by at least 25 percent of the registered voters of the district, the board of directors shall adopt a resolution placing the question on the ballot.

(e) If the question is submitted to the voters at a general district election, the notice required by Section 12112 of the Elections Code shall contain a statement of the question to appear on the ballot. If the question is submitted to the voters at a special election, the notice of election and ballot shall contain a statement of the question.

(f) If the majority of voters voting upon the question approves the election of directors either by divisions or from divisions, the board of directors shall promptly adopt a resolution dividing the district into five divisions. The resolution shall assign a number to each division. Using the last decennial census as a basis, the divisions shall be as nearly equal in population as possible. In establishing the boundaries of the divisions, the district board may give consideration to the following factors:

(1) Topography.

(2) Geography.

(3) Cohesiveness, contiguity, integrity, and compactness of territory.

(4) Community of interests of the divisions.

(g) If the majority of voters voting upon the question approves of the election of directors either by divisions or from divisions, the members of the board of directors shall be elected by divisions or from divisions. Each member elected by division or from division shall be a resident of the election division by which or from which he or she is elected. At the district general election following the approval by the voters of the election of directors either by divisions or from divisions, the board of directors shall assign vacancies on the board of directors created by the expiration of terms to the respective divisions and the vacancies shall be filled either by or from those divisions.

(h) If the majority of voters voting on the question approves of the election of directors at large, the board of directors shall promptly adopt a resolution dissolving the divisions that had existed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 588, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5785.1.

(a) In the case of a board of directors elected by divisions or from divisions, the board of directors shall adjust the boundaries of the divisions before November 1 of the year following the year in which each decennial census is taken. If, at any time between each decennial census, a change of organization or reorganization alters the population of the district, the board of directors shall reexamine the boundaries of its divisions. If the board of directors finds that the population of any division has varied so that the divisions no longer meet the criteria specified in subdivision (f) of Section 5785, the board of directors shall adjust the boundaries of the divisions so that the divisions shall be as nearly equal in population as possible. The board of directors shall make this change within 60 days of the effective date of the change of organization or reorganization.

(b) In the case of a board of directors that has been appointed by more than one county board of supervisors or city council, the board of directors shall adjust the proportionate distribution of the appointments before November 1 of the year following the year in which each decennial census is taken. If at any time between each decennial census, a change of organization or reorganization alters the population of the district, the board of directors shall reexamine the proportionate distribution of appointments. If the board of directors finds that the population of the district has varied so that the distribution of appointments is no longer proportionate, the board of directors shall adjust the proportionate distribution of appointments accordingly. The board of directors shall make this change within 60 days of the effective date of the change of organization or reorganization. The county board of supervisors or city council shall appoint members to the board of directors as vacancies occur.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5785.3.

(a) If a majority of the voters voting on the question at a general district or special district election are in favor, a district that has an appointed board of directors shall have an elected board of directors, or a district that has an elected board of directors shall have an appointed board of directors.

(b) The board of directors may adopt a resolution placing the question on the ballot. Alternatively, upon receipt of a petition signed by at least 25 percent of the registered voters of the district, the board of directors shall adopt a resolution placing the question on the ballot.

(c) If the question is submitted to the voters at a general district election, the notice required by Section 12112 of the Elections Code shall contain a statement of the question to appear on the ballot. If the question is submitted to the voters at a special election, the notice of election and ballot shall contain a statement of the question.

(d) If a majority of voters voting upon the question approves of changing from an appointed board of directors to an elected board of directors, the members of the board of directors shall be elected at the next general district election. If a majority of voters voting upon the question approves of changing from an elected board of directors to an appointed board of directors, members shall be appointed to the board of directors as vacancies occur.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 588, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5785.5.

(a) Before circulating any petition pursuant to Section 5785 or Section 5785.3, the proponents shall publish a notice of intention that shall include a written statement not to exceed 500 words in length, setting forth the reasons for the proposal. The notice shall be published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the district. If the district is located in more than one county, publication of the notice shall be made in at least one newspaper of general circulation in each county.

(b) The notice shall be signed by at least one, but not more than three, proponents and shall be in substantially the following form:

“Notice of Intent to Circulate Petition

Notice is hereby given of the intention to circulate a petition affecting the Board of Directors of the ______ (name of the district). The petition proposes that ______ (description of the proposal).” 

(c) Within five days after the date of publication, the proponents shall file with the secretary of the board of directors a copy of the notice together with an affidavit made by a representative of the newspaper in which the notice was published certifying to the fact of publication.

(d) After the filing required pursuant to subdivision (c), the petition may be circulated for signatures.

(e) Sections 100 and 104 of the Elections Code shall govern the signing of the petition and the format of the petition.

(f) A petition may consist of a single instrument or separate counterparts. The proponents shall file the petition, together with all counterparts, with the secretary of the board of directors. The secretary shall not accept a petition for filing unless the signatures have been secured within six months of the date on which the first signature was obtained and the proponents submitted the petition to the secretary for filing within 60 days after the last signature was obtained.

(g) Within 30 days after the date of filing a petition, the secretary of the board of directors shall cause the petition to be examined by the county elections official, in accordance with Sections 9113 to 9115, inclusive, of the Elections Code, and shall prepare a certificate of sufficiency indicating whether the petition is signed by the requisite number of signers.

(h) If the certificate of the secretary shows the petition to be insufficient, the secretary shall immediately give notice by certified mail of the insufficiency to the proponents. That mailed notice shall state in what amount the petition is insufficient. Within 15 days after the date of the notice of insufficiency, the proponents may file with the secretary a supplemental petition bearing additional signatures.

(i) Within 10 days after the date of filing a supplemental petition, the secretary shall examine the supplemental petition and certify the results in writing of his or her examination.

(j) The secretary shall sign and date a certificate of sufficiency. That certificate shall also state the minimum signature requirements for a sufficient petition and show the results of the secretary’s examination. The secretary shall mail a copy of the certificate of sufficiency to the proponents.

(k) Once the proponents have filed a sufficient petition, the board of directors shall take the actions required pursuant to Section 5785 or 5785.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Powers and Duties [5786. - 5786.31.]

5786.

A district may:

(a) Organize, promote, conduct, and advertise programs of community recreation, including, but not limited to, parks and open space, parking, transportation, and other related services that improve the community’s quality of life.

(b) Establish systems of recreation and recreation facilities, including, but not limited to, parks and open space.

(c) Acquire, construct, improve, maintain, and operate recreation facilities, including, but not limited to, parks and open space, both inside and beyond the district’s boundaries.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5786.1.

A district shall have and may exercise all rights and powers, expressed or implied, necessary to carry out the purposes and intent of this chapter, including, but not limited to, the following powers:

(a) To sue and be sued.

(b) To acquire any real or personal property within or outside the district, to hold, manage, occupy, dispose of, convey and encumber the property, and to create a leasehold interest in the property for the benefit of the district.

(c) To acquire any real or personal property by eminent domain within the boundaries of the district, pursuant to Section 5786.5.

(d) To appoint necessary employees, to define their qualifications and duties, and to provide a schedule of compensation for performance of their duties.

(e) To engage counsel and other professional services.

(f) To enter into and perform all necessary contracts pursuant to Article 53.5 (commencing with Section 20815) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of the Public Contract Code.

(g) To borrow money, give security therefor, and purchase on contract, as provided in this chapter.

(h) To adopt a seal and alter it at pleasure.

(i) To adopt ordinances following the procedures of Article 7 (commencing with Section 25120) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 2 of Title 3 of the Government Code.

(j) To adopt and enforce rules and regulations for the administration, operation, use, and maintenance of the recreation facilities, programs, and services listed in Section 5786.

(k) To enter joint powers agreements pursuant to the Joint Exercise of Powers Act, Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(l) To provide insurance pursuant to Part 6 (commencing with Section 989) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(m) To perform any acts necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5786.3.

When acquiring, improving, or using any real property, a district shall comply with Article 5 (commencing with Section 53090) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, and Article 7 (commencing with Section 65400) of Chapter 1 of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5786.5.

(a) If a district was formed without the power of eminent domain, the district shall not exercise eminent domain to acquire any real or personal property, except as provided by subdivision (d).

(b) If a district was formed with the power to acquire any real or personal property by eminent domain within the boundaries of the district, the district shall comply with the requirements of the Eminent Domain Law, Title 7 (commencing with Section 1230.010) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(c) In addition to the requirements imposed by subdivision (b), before a district may exercise the power of eminent domain, it shall first obtain the approval of the city council if the property is located in incorporated territory or the county board of supervisors if the property is located in unincorporated territory. The district shall notify the property owner of the district’s request to the city council or county board of supervisors. The district shall mail the notice to the property owner at least 20 days before the date on which the city council or county board of supervisors will act on the district’s request.

(d) (1) If a district was formed with the power to acquire real or personal property by the power of eminent domain, it shall not exercise that power if a majority of the voters voting upon the question are in favor of the question at a general district or special election. If a district was formed without the power to acquire real or personal property by the power of eminent domain, it may exercise that power if a majority of the voters voting upon the question are in favor of the question at a general district or special election.

(2) The board of directors may adopt a resolution placing the question on the ballot. Alternatively, upon receipt of a petition signed by at least 25 percent of the registered voters of the district, the board of directors shall adopt a resolution placing the question on the ballot.

(3) If the question is submitted to the voters at a general district election, the notice required by Section 12112 of the Elections Code shall contain a statement of the question to appear on the ballot. If the question is submitted to the voters at a special election, the notice of election and ballot shall contain a statement of the question.

(4) Before circulating any petition pursuant to this subdivision, the proponents shall publish a notice of intention which shall include a written statement not to exceed 500 words in length, setting forth the reasons for the proposal. The notice shall be published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the district. If the district is located in more than one county, publication of the notice shall be made in at least one newspaper of general circulation in each county.

(5) The notice shall be signed by at least one, but not more than three, proponents and shall be in substantially the following form:

“Notice of Intent to Circulate Petition

Notice is hereby given of the intention to circulate a petition affecting power of eminent domain of the ______ (name of the district). The petition proposes that ______ (description of the proposal).”

(6) Within five days after the date of publication, the proponents shall file with the secretary of the board of directors a copy of the notice together with an affidavit made by a representative of the newspaper in which the notice was published certifying to the fact of publication. After the filing, the petition may be circulated for signatures.

(7) Sections 100 and 104 of the Elections Code shall govern the signing of the petition and the format of the petition. A petition may consist of a single instrument or separate counterparts. The proponents shall file the petition, together with all counterparts, with the secretary of the board of directors. The secretary shall not accept a petition for filing unless the signatures have been secured within six months of the date on which the first signature was obtained and the proponents submitted the petition to the secretary for filing within 60 days after the last signature was obtained.

(8) Within 30 days after the date of filing a petition, the secretary of the board of directors shall cause the petition to be examined by the county elections official, in accordance with Sections 9113 to 9115, inclusive, of the Elections Code, and shall prepare a certificate of sufficiency indicating whether the petition is signed by the requisite number of signers.

(9) If the certificate of the secretary shows the petition to be insufficient, the secretary shall immediately give notice by certified mail of the insufficiency to the proponents. That mailed notice shall state in what amount the petition is insufficient. Within 15 days after the date of the notice of insufficiency, the proponents may file with the secretary a supplemental petition bearing additional signatures.

(10) Within 10 days after the date of filing a supplemental petition, the secretary shall examine the supplemental petition and certify the results in writing of his or her examination.

(11) The secretary shall sign and date a certificate of sufficiency. That certificate shall also state the minimum signature requirements for a sufficient petition and show the results of the secretary’s examination. The secretary shall mail a copy of the certificate of sufficiency to the proponents.

(12) Once the proponents have filed a sufficient petition, the board of directors shall adopt the resolution required by paragraph (2).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 588, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5786.7.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law:

(a) If a majority of the voters voting on the question at a general district or special district election are in favor, the Parker Dam Recreation and Park District may do all of the following:

(1) Purchase or lease electric power from any public agency or private entity for use within the district’s boundaries.

(2) Acquire water and water rights and do any act necessary to furnish sufficient water for beneficial use within the district’s boundaries.

(3) Sell, dispose of, and distribute water and electric power for use within the district’s boundaries.

(4) Provide street lighting facilities and services.

(b) Provided that the authority to exercise these powers is approved by the local agency formation commission and conforms to Article XIIIC of the California Constitution, the Camp Meeker Recreation and Park District may exercise the powers of a county water district pursuant to:

(1) Article 1 (commencing with Section 31000) to Article 9 (commencing with Section 31100), inclusive, of Part 5 of Division 12 of the Water Code.

(2) Part 6 (commencing with Section 31300) of Division 12 of
 the Water Code.

(3) Part 7 (commencing with Section 31650) of Division 12 of the Water Code.

(c) The Coachella Valley Recreation and Park District and the Hesperia Recreation and Park District may provide street lighting facilities and services.

(d) The Lucerne Recreation and Park District may exercise any of the powers, functions, and duties of a fire protection district pursuant to the Fire Protection District Law of 1987, Part 3 (commencing with Section 13800) of Division 12 of the Health and Safety Code.

(e) Upon approval of the Siskiyou Local Agency Formation Commission pursuant to Section 56824.14 of the Government Code, the Weed
 Recreation and Parks District may exercise any of the powers, functions, and duties of a cemetery district pursuant to the Public Cemetery District Law of 2003, Part 4 (commencing
 with Section 9000) of Division 8 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 329, Sec. 17.   (SB 780)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

5786.9.

(a) A district shall have perpetual succession.

(b) A board of directors may, by a four-fifths vote of its total membership, adopt a resolution to change the name of the district. The resolution shall comply with the requirements of Chapter 23 (commencing with Section 7530) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code. The board of directors shall not change the name of the district to the name of any living individual. Within 10 days of its adoption, the board of directors shall file a copy of its resolution with the Secretary of State, the county clerk, the board of supervisors, and the local agency formation commission of each county in which the district is located.

(c) A district may destroy a record pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 60200) of Division 1 of Title 6 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

5786.11.

(a) A district may cooperate with any city, county, special district, school district, state agency, or federal agency to carry out the purposes and intent of this chapter. To that end, a district may enter into agreements with those other public agencies to do any and all things necessary or convenient in carrying out the purposes and intent of this chapter.

(b) A district may jointly acquire, construct, improve, maintain, and operate recreation facilities and programs of community recreation with any other public agency. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit any joint or cooperative action with other public agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5786.13.

A district may contract with other public agencies to provide recreation facilities and programs of community recreation within the district’s boundaries. A district may contract with other public agencies to provide recreation facilities and programs of community recreation within the boundaries of other public agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5786.15.

(a) Each district shall adopt policies and procedures, including bidding regulations, governing the purchase of supplies and equipment. Each district shall adopt these policies and procedures by rule or regulation pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 54201) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(b) A district may request the Department of General Services to make purchases of materials, equipment, or supplies on its behalf pursuant to Section 10324 of the Public Contract Code.

(c) A district may request the purchasing agent of the principal county to make purchases of materials, equipment, or supplies on its behalf, pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 25500) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of Title 3 of the Government Code.

(d) A district may request the purchasing agent of the principal county to contract with persons to provide recreation facilities and programs of community recreation, pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 25500) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of Title 3 of the Government Code. The district shall be responsible for and maintain control over those recreational facilities and programs of community recreation.

(e) A district may lease or rent private vehicles or equipment owned by district employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5786.17.

(a) Violation of any rule, regulation, or ordinance adopted by a board of directors is a misdemeanor punishable pursuant to Section 19 of the Penal Code.

(b) Any citation issued by a district for violation of a rule, regulation, or ordinance adopted by a board of directors may be processed as an infraction pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 17 of the Penal Code.

(c) To protect property and to preserve the peace at recreation facilities and other property owned or managed by a district, the board of directors may confer on designated uniformed district employees the power to issue citations for misdemeanor and infraction violations of state law, city or county ordinances, or district rules, regulations, or ordinances when the violation is committed within a recreation facility and in the presence of the employee issuing the citation. District employees shall issue citations pursuant to Chapter 5C (commencing with Section 853.5) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5786.19.

(a) The Meyers-Milias-Brown Act, Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code applies to all districts.

(b) A board of directors may adopt an ordinance establishing an employee relations system which may include, but is not limited to, a civil service system or a merit system.
